Utah statutes.
51-7-22.   Penalty for violation by public treasurer.

(1)  Any public treasurer who willfully violates the deposit and investment provisions of this chapter is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

(2)  Any public treasurer who knowingly makes or causes to be made a false statement or report to the council is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

